Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-6,100.03
Joint city-county building; indebtedness; bonds; principal and interest; in addition to other limitations.

The amount of indebtedness authorized to be incurred by any county or city of the first class for the payment of principal and interest for the bonds authorized by the provisions of sections 16-6,100.01 to 16-6,100.07 shall be in addition to and over and above any limits provided by law.

Laws 1953, c. 32, § 3, p. 121;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 162.
July 21, 2016